Hawaii statutes.
§412:1-106 Headings; references. The
meaning or scope of any provision of this chapter is not affected by any
heading. Any references in this chapter to federal laws or regulations shall
be deemed to refer to successor laws and regulations unless the reference is
clearly inapplicable. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next